Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

CHAPTER 307. EMPLOYMENT SERVICE

Sec. 307.001. EMPLOYMENT SERVICE. The commission is the agency of this state designated to cooperate with the United States Employment Service as necessary to perform the duties of this state under the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Section 49 et seq.) required to establish and maintain free public employment offices.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 202.081 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 307.002. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AGREEMENTS. (a) To ensure the establishment and maintenance of public employment offices under this chapter, the executive director may enter into an agreement with any political subdivision of the state or with a private or nonprofit organization, including a local workforce development board, and, as a part of the agreement, accept money, services, or quarters as a contribution to the employment service account.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), to establish and maintain, or assist in the establishment and maintenance of, public employment offices within a county or other political subdivision of this state, the commissioners court of the county or the governing body of the other political subdivision may enter into agreements with the employment service on terms and conditions agreed to by the commissioners court or other governing body and the employment service. The county or other political subdivision may employ means and appropriate and spend funds as necessary to establish and operate the public employment offices, and may provide, as part of the agreement, payment for:

(1) the rent of premises;

(2) services rendered;

(3) the purchase of equipment; and

(4) any other purpose considered advisable by the commissioners court or other governing body.

(c) In an area in which a local workforce development board has been certified and a local plan approved by the governor, that board shall provide employment services in its local workforce development area, and a person employed by the commission to provide employment services on the day before the approved local plan takes effect shall be given preference in employment at a career development center administered by that board.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 202.082 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 307.003. EMPLOYMENT SERVICE FINANCING. Money received by the state under the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Section 49 et seq.) shall be deposited to the credit of the employment service account in the general revenue fund. The money in the account may be used by the commission as provided by this chapter and the Wagner-Peyser Act.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 203.153 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.